District of Columbia statutes.
2-506

Filing and publishing of rules.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1968, 82 Stat. 1207, Pub. L. 90-614, § 7
Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title I, § 102(g), 22 DCR 2048
Mar. 25, 1977, D.C. Law 1-96 § 3(a), (c)
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 6(b), 25 DCR 6960
1981 Ed., Omitted.
1973 Ed., § 1-1506.